Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
LANDLORD OBLIGATIONS

[§521-41] Landlord to supply possession of
dwelling unit. The landlord shall, at the beginning of the agreed term,
deliver possession of the dwelling unit to the tenant in the agreed condition
unless otherwise agreed prior to delivery of possession. The landlord may
bring an action for possession against any person wrongfully in possession
including a holdover tenant. [L 1972, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next